Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-805
Rule 805. Hearsay within hearsay.

Hearsay included within hearsay is not excluded under the hearsay rule if each part of the combined statements conforms with an exception to the hearsay rule provided in these rules.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 59.

Police complaint report admitted into evidence was not hearsay within hearsay because each part of the combined statements conformed with an exception to the hearsay rule. State v. Wilson, 225 Neb. 466, 406 N.W.2d 123 (1987).

A child sexual assault victim's statements, as relayed to a doctor by a forensic examiner and testified to by a doctor, were admissible even though they were double hearsay because each part of the combined statements conformed with an exception to the hearsay rule. State v. Edwards, 28 Neb. App. 893, 949 N.W.2d 799 (2020).